Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-407
Nebraska Library Commission; reports from all libraries required.

The director shall each year obtain from all libraries in the state reports showing the conditions, growth, development and manner of conducting such libraries, together with such other facts and statistics regarding the same as may be deemed of public interest by the Nebraska Library Commission.

Laws 1935, c. 115, § 7, p. 371;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 51-507;

R.S.1943, § 51-407;

Laws 1972, LB 1033, § 11.